Massachusetts, session 194th, H657.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (i), clause (3) by striking the words “provided,
however, notwithstanding subsection (c) the 14 new Horace Mann charter schools shall not be
subject to the requirement of an agreement with the local collective bargaining unit prior to
board approval; provided, further, that after the charter for these 14 new Horace Mann charter
schools have been granted by the board, the schools shall develop a memorandum of
understanding with the school committee and the local union regarding any waivers to applicable
collective bargaining agreements; provided, further, that if an agreement is not reached on the
memorandum of understanding at least 30 days before the scheduled opening of the school, the
charter school shall operate under the terms of its charter until an agreement is reached”
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 92 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (l), as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place
thereof the following subsection:-
(l) Upon the completion of the innovation plan in subsection (j), the applicant, a local
union and the superintendent shall negotiate waivers or modifications to the applicable collective
bargaining agreement necessary for the school to implement the innovation plan.
In the case of a school conversion, upon the conclusion of the negotiations, the
innovation plan shall be submitted immediately to the teachers in the school that is proposed for
conversion for approval by secret ballot within 30 days. A two-thirds vote of the teachers shall
be required to approve the plan. If a two-thirds vote is not achieved, the local union and
superintendent may revise the innovation plan as necessary and submit the revised plan to the
teachers for a subsequent vote.
Upon the conclusion of the negotiations, the innovation plan shall be submitted
immediately to the school committee.
of 2